Maryland, session 2025, HB1156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
7–202.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of [ten] AT LEAST 15 BUT NOT MORE THAN
20 members.
(2) (I) [With the approval of the] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (III)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE Governor [and the advice and consent of the Senate, the
Secretary] shall appoint the members of the Commission FROM AMONG NOMINEES
CHOSEN BY A PANEL CONSISTING OF:
1. THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND
POLICE TRAINING AND STANDARDS COMMISSION;
2. THE PUBLIC DEFENDER OF MARYLAND;
3. THE PRESIDENT OF THE MARYLAND STATE’S
ATTORNEYS’ ASSOCIATION;
4. THREE SERVICE PROVIDERS FROM THE FIELDS OF
MENTAL HEALTH, SUBSTANCE USE TREATMENT, VOCATIONAL AND EDUCATIONAL
TRAINING, OR COMMUNITY ORGANIZING, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR;
5. THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF EDUCATION;
6. THE PRESIDENT OF THE NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF
SOCIAL WORKERS – MARYLAND CHAPTER, OR THE PRESIDENT’S DESIGNEE;
7. THREE MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR; AND
8. ONE PRISONERS’ RIGHTS ADVOCATE, CHOSEN BY THE
GOVERNOR.
(II) THE PANEL SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GOVERNOR THE NAMES
OF AT LEAST THREE QUALIFIED NOMINEES FOR EACH COMMISSIONER VACANCY TO
BE FILLED.

HOUSE BILL 1156 3
(III) THE REQUIREMENT FOR NOMINATION BY THE PANEL
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO AN INITIAL TERM AS COMMISSIONER
AND NOT TO ANY SUBSEQUENT CONSECUTIVE TERM OF A SITTING COMMISSIONER
WHOSE INITIAL APPOINTMENT TO OFFICE WAS MADE PURSUANT TO PANEL
NOMINATION.
(b) Each commissioner shall:
(1) be appointed without regard to political affiliation;
(2) be a resident of the State; and
(3) have training and experience in law, sociology, psychology, psychiatry,
education, social work, or criminology.
(c) Each commissioner:
(1) shall devote full time to the duties of the Commission; and
(2) may not have any other employment that conflicts with the
commissioner’s devotion of full time to the duties of the Commission.
(d) (1) The term of a commissioner is 6 years.
(2) At the end of a term, a commissioner continues to serve until a successor
is appointed and qualifies.
(3) A commissioner who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for
the rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(e) (1) With the approval of the Governor, the Secretary may remove a
commissioner for disability, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office.
(2) Before removing a commissioner, the Secretary shall:
(i) give the commissioner written notice of the charges against the
commissioner; and
(ii) hold a public hearing on the charges.
(f) [(1) If a commissioner is unable to perform the commissioner’s duties
because of sickness, incapacity, or disqualification, the Secretary may appoint a hearing
examiner to the Commission to perform those duties until that commissioner is able to
resume those duties or until a new commissioner is appointed and qualifies.

HOUSE BILL 1156
(2) A hearing examiner appointed under this subsection is entitled to the
same compensation as a commissioner.
(3) A hearing examiner appointed under this subsection may not
participate in a proceeding before the Commission in which the hearing examiner
participated as a hearing examiner.
(g)] With the approval of the Governor, the Secretary shall designate a
chairperson of the Commission from among its members.
7–204.
(a) [(1)] The Commission shall appoint the staff necessary to perform the duties
of the Commission.
[(2)] (B) The activities of the staff may not duplicate or conflict with the
functions and services of the Division of Parole and Probation.
[(3)] (C) Except as otherwise provided by law, the staff is subject to the
provisions of Title 6, Subtitle 4 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
[(b) (1) (i) The Secretary may appoint the hearing examiners necessary to
conduct parole release hearings under paragraph (2) of this subsection, as provided in the
State budget.
(ii) Each hearing examiner shall:
1. be appointed without regard to political affiliation;
2. be a resident of the State; and
3. have training and experience in law, sociology, psychology,
psychiatry, education, social work, or criminology.
(iii) A hearing examiner is entitled to compensation in accordance
with the State budget.
(2) A hearing examiner or a commissioner acting as a hearing examiner
may hear cases for parole release that are not required to be heard by the Commission
under § 7–205(a)(3) of this subtitle.]
7–205.
(a) The Commission has the exclusive power to:

HOUSE BILL 1156 5
(1) authorize the parole of an individual sentenced under the laws of the
State to any correctional facility in the State;
(2) negotiate, enter into, and sign predetermined parole release
agreements as provided under subsection (b) of this section;
(3) hear cases for parole or administrative release [in which:
(i) the Commissioner of Correction, after reviewing the
recommendation of the appropriate managing official, objects to a parole;
(ii) the incarcerated individual was convicted of a homicide;
(iii) the incarcerated individual is serving a sentence of life
imprisonment;
(iv) the parole hearing is open to the public under § 7–304 of this title;
(v) the incarcerated individual fails to meet the requirements of the
administrative release process established under § 7–301.1 of this title;
(vi) a victim requests a hearing as provided under § 7–301.1 of this
title; or
(vii) the Commission finds that a hearing for administrative release
is necessary under § 7–301.1 of this title];
(4) [hear exceptions to recommendations of a hearing examiner or a
commissioner acting as a hearing examiner;
(5) review summarily all recommendations of a hearing examiner or a
commissioner acting as a hearing examiner to which an exception has not been filed;
(6)] hear a case for parole in absentia when an individual who was
sentenced in this State to serve a term of imprisonment is in a correctional facility of a
jurisdiction other than this State;
[(7)] (5) hear cases of parole revocation;
[(8)] (6) if delegated by the Governor, hear cases involving an alleged
violation of a conditional pardon; and
[(9)] (7) determine conditions for administrative release under § 7–301.1
of this title.
7–207.

HOUSE BILL 1156
(a) [(1)] Subject to the approval of the Secretary, the Commission shall adopt
regulations governing its policies and activities under this title.
[(2)] (B) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 10–101(g)(2)(i) of the State
Government Article, regulations adopted under [paragraph (1) of this subsection]
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION shall comply with Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State
Government Article.
[(b) The Commission may adopt regulations governing:
(1) the conduct of proceedings before it or the hearing examiners; and
(2) the review and disposition of written exceptions to the recommendation
of a hearing examiner.]
7–302.
The Commission [or the Commission’s hearing examiners] shall hear cases for
parole release:
(1) at least once each month at each correctional facility in the Division of
Correction; and
(2) as often as necessary at other correctional facilities in the State at
which incarcerated individuals eligible for parole consideration are confined.
7–303.
(a) Before any hearing on parole release, the Commission shall give the
incarcerated individual adequate and timely written notice of:
(1) the date, time, and place of the hearing; and
(2) the factors that the Commission [or hearing examiner] will consider in
determining whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
notice also shall indicate that, before the hearing, the incarcerated individual or the
incarcerated individual’s representative may, on request, examine any document that the
Commission [or hearing examiner] will use in determining whether the incarcerated
individual is suitable for parole.
(ii) A document, or a portion of it, is not available for examination, if
the Commission determines that:

HOUSE BILL 1156 7
1. the document or portion contains a diagnostic opinion;
2. the incarcerated individual’s knowledge of the document
or portion would disrupt seriously a program of rehabilitation;
3. the document or portion contains sources of information
obtained on a promise of confidentiality; or
4. the document or portion is otherwise privileged.
(iii) If the Commission determines that a document or a portion of it
is not available for examination, the Commission shall notify the incarcerated individual
that:
1. the document or portion is not available for examination;
and
2. on request and if appropriate, the Commission will provide
the incarcerated individual or the incarcerated individual’s representative with the
substance of any information contained in the document or portion.
(2) The Commission shall delete the address and phone number of the
victim or the victim’s designated representative from a document before the incarcerated
individual or the incarcerated individual’s representative examines the document.
7–305.
Each [hearing examiner and] commissioner determining whether an incarcerated
individual is suitable for parole, and the Commission before entering into a predetermined
parole release agreement, shall consider:
(1) the circumstances surrounding the crime;
(2) the physical, mental, and moral qualifications of the incarcerated
individual;
(3) the progress of the incarcerated individual during confinement,
including the academic progress of the incarcerated individual in the mandatory education
program required under § 22–102 of the Education Article;
(4) a report on a drug or alcohol evaluation that has been conducted on the
incarcerated individual, including any recommendations concerning the incarcerated
individual’s amenability for treatment and the availability of an appropriate treatment
program;
(5) whether there is reasonable probability that the incarcerated
individual, if released on parole, will remain at liberty without violating the law;

HOUSE BILL 1156
(6) whether release of the incarcerated individual on parole is compatible
with the welfare of society;
(7) an updated victim impact statement or recommendation prepared
under § 7–801 of this title;
(8) any recommendation made by the sentencing judge at the time of
sentencing;
(9) any information that is presented to a commissioner at a meeting with
the victim;
(10) any testimony presented to the Commission by the victim or the victim’s
designated representative under § 7–801 of this title; and
(11) compliance with the case plan developed under § 7–301.1 of this subtitle
or § 3–601 of this article.
[7–306.
(a) (1) The chairperson of the Commission shall assign hearing examiners, or
commissioners acting as hearing examiners, as required to hear cases for parole.
(2) Each proceeding before a hearing examiner shall be conducted in
accordance with this section.
(b) The Commission shall keep a record of each hearing conducted by a hearing
examiner.
(c) A hearing examiner shall determine if an incarcerated individual is suitable
for parole in accordance with the factors and other information specified in § 7–305 of this
subtitle.
(d) (1) At the conclusion of the hearing, the hearing examiner shall inform the
incarcerated individual of the hearing examiner’s recommendation for parole or denial of
parole.
(2) Within 21 days after the hearing, the hearing examiner shall give to
the Commission, the Commissioner of Correction, and the incarcerated individual a written
report of the hearing examiner’s findings and recommendation for parole or denial of parole.
(3) The Commissioner of Correction or the incarcerated individual may file
with the Commission written exceptions to the report of a hearing examiner no later than
5 days after the report is received.

HOUSE BILL 1156 9
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, one commissioner assigned
by the chairperson of the Commission shall review summarily the recommendation of the
hearing examiner.
(2) (i) The Commission, on its own initiative or on the filing of an
exception, may schedule a hearing on the record by the entire Commission or by a panel of
at least two commissioners assigned by the chairperson of the Commission.
(ii) The Commission or panel shall render a written decision on the
appeal.
(iii) The decision of the Commission or panel is final.
(3) If an exception is not filed and the Commission does not act on its own
initiative within the 5–day appeal period established under subsection (d)(3) of this section,
the recommendation of the hearing examiner is approved.]
7–307.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the chairperson of
the Commission shall assign at least two commissioners to hear cases for parole release as
a panel.
(2) Each proceeding before a Commission panel shall be conducted in
accordance with this section.
(b) (1) (i) A Commission panel that consists of two commissioners shall
determine, by unanimous vote, whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole
in accordance with the factors and other information specified in § 7–305 of this subtitle.
(ii) If the two–commissioner panel is unable to reach a unanimous
decision, the chairperson of the Commission shall convene a three–commissioner panel as
soon as practicable to rehear the case.
(2) A Commission panel that consists of three commissioners shall
determine, by majority vote, whether the incarcerated individual is suitable for parole in
accordance with the factors and other information specified in § 7–305 of this subtitle.
(c) For an incarcerated individual who has been sentenced to life imprisonment
after being convicted of a crime committed on or after October 1, 2021, at least six
affirmative votes are required to approve the incarcerated individual for parole, based on
consideration of the factors specified in § 7–305 of this subtitle.
(d) (1) The Commission panel shall inform the incarcerated individual and the
appropriate correctional authority of the Commission’s decision as soon as possible.

HOUSE BILL 1156
(2) If parole is denied, the Commission shall give the incarcerated
individual a written report of its findings within 30 days after the hearing.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds budgeted for hearing examiner salaries as of the effective date of
this Act be re–budgeted for parole commissioner salaries.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.